Virginia statutes. Title 60.2. Unemployment Compensation.
Chapter 2. Definitions.
§ 60.2-218.
Employment taxed by federal law.

Notwithstanding any other provision of §§

60.2-212

through

60.2-217

and §

60.2-219

, the term “employment” shall mean service with respect to which a tax is required to be paid under any federal law imposing a tax against which credit may be taken for taxes required to be paid into a state unemployment fund or which as a condition for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act is required to be covered under this title.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-14; 1952, cc. 30, 184; 1956, c. 440; 1962, c. 71; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-14; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 235; 1972, c. 824; 1974, cc. 466, 660; 1976, c. 304; 1977, c. 330; 1979, c. 637; 1980, cc. 520, 522; 1981, cc. 28, 369, 374, 375; 1982, c. 25; 1983, c. 14; 1984, cc. 120, 139, 204; 1985, cc. 152, 254; 1986, c. 480.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Unemployment Compensation, § 7.

§ 60.2-219.
Services not included in term “employment.”

The term “employment” shall not include:

Service performed in the employ of the United States government or of any instrumentality of the United States which is wholly or partially owned by the United States or which is exempt from the tax imposed by § 3301 of the Federal Internal Revenue Code by virtue of any provision of law which specifically refers to such section (or the corresponding section of prior law) in granting such exemption;

Service with respect to which unemployment compensation is payable under an unemployment compensation system established by an act of Congress, including service performed after June 30, 1939, for an employer determined to be subject to the Railroad Unemployment Insurance Act (45 U.S.C. § 351 et seq.) by the agency or agencies empowered to make such determination by an act of Congress, and service as an employer representative determined to be subject to such act by such agency or agencies. The Commission is hereby authorized and directed to enter into agreements with the proper agencies under such act of Congress, which agreements shall become effective 10 days after publication thereof, in the manner provided in §

60.2-111

for general rules, to provide reciprocal treatment to individuals who have, after acquiring potential rights to benefits under this title, acquired rights to unemployment compensation under such act of Congress, or who have, after acquiring potential rights to unemployment compensation under such act of Congress, acquired rights to benefits under this title;

Agricultural labor as defined in §

60.2-201

except as provided for in §

60.2-214

;

Domestic service in a private home, local college club or local chapter of a college fraternity or sorority except as provided for in §

60.2-215

;

Service performed on or in connection with a vessel or aircraft not an American vessel or American aircraft by an employee, if the employee is employed on and in connection with such vessel or aircraft when outside the United States;

Service performed by an individual in, or as an officer or member of the crew of, a vessel while it is engaged in the catching, taking, harvesting, cultivating or farming of any kind of fish, shellfish, crustacea, sponges, seaweeds or other aquatic forms of animal and vegetable life, including service performed by any such individual as an ordinary incident to any such activity, except (i) service performed in connection with the catching or taking of salmon or halibut for commercial purposes and (ii) service performed on or in connection with a vessel of more than 10 net tons, determined in the manner provided for determining the register tonnage of merchant vessels under the laws of the United States;

Such individual does not receive any cash remuneration, other than as provided in subdivision b;

Such individual receives a share of the boat’s, or the boats’ in the case of a fishing operation involving more than one boat, catch of fish or other forms of aquatic animal life, or a share of the proceeds from the sale of such catch; and

The amount of such individual’s share depends on the amount of the boat’s, or the boats’ in the case of a fishing operation involving more than one boat, catch of fish or other forms of aquatic animal life, but only if the operating crew of such boat, or each boat from which the individual receives a share in the case of a fishing operation involving more than one boat is normally made up of fewer than 10 individuals;

Service performed by an individual in the employ of his son, daughter, or spouse and service performed by a child under the age of 21 in the employ of his father or mother;

Service performed in any calendar quarter in the employ of any organization exempt from income tax (i) under § 501(a) of the Federal Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C.), other than an organization described in § 401(a) of such Code, or (ii) under § 521 of the Federal Internal Revenue Code, if the remuneration for such service is less than $50;

Service performed in the employ of a school or institution of higher education, if such service is performed by a student who is enrolled and is regularly attending classes at such school or institution;

Service performed as a student nurse in the employ of a hospital or a nurses’ training school by an individual who is enrolled and is regularly attending classes in a nurses’ training school chartered or approved pursuant to state law;

Service performed as an intern in the employ of a hospital by an individual who has completed a four-year course in a medical school chartered or approved pursuant to state law;

Service performed by an individual for an employing unit as an insurance agent or as an insurance solicitor, if all such service performed by such individual for such employing unit is performed for remuneration solely by way of commission;

Service performed by an individual for an employing unit as a real estate salesman, if all such service performed by such individual for such employing unit is performed for remuneration solely by way of commission;

Service covered by an arrangement between the Commission and the agency charged with the administration of any other state or federal unemployment compensation law pursuant to which all services performed by an individual for an employing unit during the period covered by such employing unit’s duly approved election are deemed to be performed entirely within such agency’s state or under such federal law;

Service performed by an individual for an employing unit as an agent in the wholesale distribution and sale of gasoline and other petroleum products, if all such service performed by such individual for such employing unit is performed for remuneration solely by way of commission;

Service not in the course of the employer’s trade or business performed in any calendar quarter by an employee, unless the cash remuneration paid for such service is $50 or more and such service is performed by an individual who is regularly employed by such employer to perform such service. For the purposes of this subdivision, an individual shall be deemed to be regularly employed by an employer during a calendar quarter only if (i) on each of some 24 days during such quarter such individual performs for such employer for some portion of the day service not in the course of the employer’s trade or business, or (ii) such individual was regularly employed, as determined under clause (i) of this subdivision, by such employer in the performance of such service during the preceding calendar quarter;

Service performed by an individual who is enrolled at a nonprofit or public educational institution which normally maintains a regular faculty and curriculum and normally has a regularly organized body of students in attendance at the place where its educational activities are carried on. In order for such services to be excluded from “employment”:

The individual shall be enrolled as a student in a full-time program,

The program shall be taken for credit at such institution,

The program combines academic instruction with work experience, and

Such service shall be an integral part of such program.

Such institution shall certify to the employer that subdivisions 17 a (1) through 17 a (4) have been met.

This subdivision shall not apply to service performed in a program established for or on behalf of an employer or group of employers;

Has a valid business license issued by the locality in which such individual performs such services; and

Service performed in the employ of a hospital, if such service is performed by a patient of the hospital, as defined in §

60.2-221

;

Services provided by an individual pursuant to an agreement among the service recipient, a public human services agency as defined in §

15.2-2811

, and such individual to an eligible service recipient in his own home or the home of the service provider, unless coverage of such services is required by the provisions of § 3304(a)(6)(A) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act;

Services performed by an individual as a “direct seller” provided that:

Service performed after July 1, 1984, by an individual as a taxicab driver, or as a driver of an executive sedan, provided the Commission is furnished evidence that such individual is excluded from taxation by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act;

Services performed by an individual as a “contract carrier courier driver” provided the Commission is furnished evidence that such individual is excluded from taxation by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act;

Services performed by a full-time student in the employ of an organized camp if:

Services performed by an individual as a court reporter for an employing unit if all such service performed by the individual for the employing unit is performed for remuneration solely by way of commission;

Services performed by an individual as a cosmetologist or as a barber provided the Commission is furnished evidence that such individual is excluded from taxation by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act;

Services performed by a licensed clinical social worker as defined in §

54.1-3700

, licensed psychologist as defined in §

54.1-3600

, licensed professional counselor as defined in §

54.1-3500

, licensed psychiatrist, or licensed marriage and family therapist as defined in §

54.1-3500

, if such individual:

Services performed by an inmate for a penal or custodial institution or while participating in the community corrections alternative program pursuant to §

19.2-316.4

.

6a.

Service performed by an individual on a boat engaged in catching fish or other forms of aquatic life under an arrangement with the owner or operator of such boat pursuant to which:

a.

Such person:

(1)

Is engaged in the trade or business of selling, or soliciting the sale of, consumer products to any buyer on a buy-sell basis, a deposit-commission basis, or any similar basis which the Secretary of the Treasury prescribes by regulations for resale by the buyer or any other person in the home or otherwise than in a permanent retail establishment;

(2)

Is engaged in the trade or business of selling, or soliciting the sale of, consumer products to a consumer in the home or otherwise than in a permanent retail establishment; or

(3)

Is engaged in the trade or business of the delivery or distribution of newspapers or shopping news (including any delivery services directly related to such trade or business).

b.

Substantially all of the remuneration for the services performed as a direct seller, whether or not paid in cash, is directly related to sales or output, including the performances of services, rather than to the number of hours worked;

c.

The services performed by the person are performed pursuant to a written contract between such person and the person for whom the services are performed and such contract provides that the person will not be treated as an employee with respect to such services for federal tax purposes;

a.

Such camp:

(1)

Did not operate for more than seven months in the calendar year and did not operate for more than seven months in the preceding calendar year; or

(2)

Had average gross receipts for any six months in the preceding calendar year which were not more than 33- 1/3 percent of its average gross receipts for the other six months in the preceding calendar year; and

b.

Such full-time student performed services in the employ of such camp for less than 13 calendar weeks in such calendar year;

a.

Operates under a contract specifying that the individual is free from control or direction over the performance of such services;

b.

Is licensed in the Commonwealth to perform independent clinical services;

c.

Is compensated solely by way of fees charged for services rendered by such individual; and

History.

Code 1950, § 60-14; 1952, cc. 30, 184; 1956, c. 440; 1962, c. 71; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-14; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 235; 1972, c. 824; 1974, cc. 466, 660; 1976, c. 304; 1977, c. 330; 1979, c. 637; 1980, cc. 520, 522; 1981, cc. 28, 369, 374, 375; 1982, c. 25; 1983, c. 14; 1984, cc. 120, 139, 204; 1985, cc. 152, 254; 1986, c. 480; 1987, c. 113; 1988, c. 678; 1989, c. 339; 1992, c. 4; 1997, cc. 171, 189; 2000, c. 438; 2003, c. 609; 2004, c. 977; 2005, c. 110; 2019, c. 618.

Editor’s note.

In subdivision 21, the reference to “executive sedan as defined in §

46.2-2000

” is now obsolete. That definition no longer exists in §

46.2-2000

.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the following changes were made to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588: in subdivision 9, substituted “institution of higher education” for “college or university” and “or institution” for “college or university”;
and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 438 inserted “clause” near the end of subdivision 16, and added “unless coverage of such services is required by the provisions of § 3304(a) (6) (A) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act” at the end of subdivision 19.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 609 substituted “10” for “ten,” “13” for “thirteen,” “21” for “twenty-one,” and “24” for “twenty-four” throughout the section; substituted “$50” for “fifty dollars” in subdivisions 8 and 16; deleted “and” at the end of subdivision 24; inserted “and” at the end of subdivision 25; and added subdivision 26.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 977 substituted “33 1/3” for “thirty-three and one-third” in subdivision 23 a 2; added subdivision 27; and made a related change.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 110, in subdivision 26, deleted “or” preceding “licensed psychiatrist” and inserted “or licensed marriage and family therapist as defined in §

54.1-3500

.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 618 substituted “community corrections alternative program pursuant to §

19.2-316.4

” for “Diversion Center Incarceration Program pursuant to §

19.2-316.3

” in subdivision 27.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Unemployment Compensation, §§ 4, 6.

§ 60.2-220.
Institution of higher education.

“Institution of higher education,”
for the purposes of this title, means an educational institution which:

Admits as regular students only individuals having a certificate of graduation from a high school, or the recognized equivalent of such a certificate;

Is legally authorized in this Commonwealth to provide a program of education beyond high school;

Provides an educational program for which it awards a bachelor’s or higher degree, or provides a program which is acceptable for full credit toward such a degree, a program of postgraduate or postdoctoral studies, or a program of training to prepare students for gainful employment in a recognized occupation;

Is a public or other nonprofit institution; and

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this subsection, all colleges and universities in this Commonwealth are institutions of higher education for purposes of this section.

History.

1971, Ex. Sess., c. 235, § 60.1-14.1; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-221.
Hospital.

“Hospital”
means an institution as defined in §§

32.1-123

and

37.2-100

.

History.

1971, Ex. Sess., c. 235, § 60.1-14.2; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-222.
Employment office.

“Employment office”
means a free public employment office, or branch thereof, operated (i) by this Commonwealth or maintained as a part of a state-controlled system of public employment offices or (ii) by a federal agency charged with the administration of free public employment offices.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-15; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-15; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-223.
Fund.

“Fund”
means the Unemployment Compensation Fund established by this title, to which all taxes required and from which all benefits provided under this title shall be paid.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-16; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-16; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-224.
Insured work.

“Insured work”
means employment for employers.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-17; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-17; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-225.
State.

“State” refers to the Commonwealth of Virginia, including land or premises located therein, owned, held or possessed by the United States, the states of the United States of America, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-18; 1962, c. 71; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-21; 1977, c. 330; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-226.
Unemployment.

An individual shall be deemed “unemployed” in any week during which he performs no services and with respect to which no wages are payable to him, or in any week of less than full-time work if the wages payable to him with respect to such week are less than his weekly benefit amount. Wages shall be deemed payable to an individual with respect to any week for which wages are due. An individual’s week of unemployment shall be deemed to commence only after his registration at an employment office, except as the Commission may by regulation otherwise prescribe.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this title, no individual shall be deemed unemployed with respect to any week he earns less than his weekly benefit amount solely because he did not work on a legal holiday as defined in §

2.2-3300

.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-20; 1954, c. 203; 1956, c. 440; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-23; 1980, c. 463; 1986, c. 480; 1992, c. 5.

§ 60.2-227.
Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund.

“Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund”
means the Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund established by this title, from which administrative expenses under this title shall be paid.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-21; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-24; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-228.
American vessel and American aircraft.

The term
“American vessel”
means any vessel documented or numbered under the laws of the United States, and includes any vessel which is neither documented or numbered under the laws of the United States nor documented under the laws of any foreign country, if its crew is employed solely by one or more citizens or residents of the United States or corporations organized under the laws of the United States or of any state. The term

“American aircraft”

means an aircraft registered under the laws of the United States.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-21.1; 1962, c. 71; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-25; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-229.
Wages.

“Wages” means all remuneration paid, or which should have been paid, for personal services, including commissions, bonuses, tips, back pay, dismissal pay, severance pay and any other payments made by an employer to an employee during his employment and thereafter and the cash value of all remuneration payable in any medium other than cash. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this subsection, wages paid in back pay awards shall be allocated to, and reported as being paid during, the calendar quarter or quarters in which such back pay would have been earned. Severance pay paid at the time of, or subsequent to, separation from employment shall be allocated to the last day of work unless otherwise allocated by the employer. If otherwise allocated, severance pay shall be allocated at a rate not less than the average weekly wage of such employee during the last calendar quarter, and reported as such. Severance pay shall be deducted from any benefits payable after the Commission’s receipt of notification of severance pay by the employer pursuant to §

60.2-603

. The reasonable cash value of remuneration payable in any medium other than cash shall be estimated and determined in accordance with rules prescribed by the Commission.

The term “wages” shall not include:

Subsequent to December 31, 1990, for purposes of taxes only, that part of the remuneration, other than remuneration referred to in the succeeding subdivisions of this subsection, that is greater than $8,000 and is payable during any calendar year to an individual by any employer with respect to employment in this Commonwealth or any other state. If an employer, hereinafter referred to as “successor employer,” during any calendar year acquires substantially all of the property used in a trade or business of another employer, hereinafter referred to as a “predecessor,” or used in a separate unit of a trade or business of a predecessor, and immediately after the acquisition employs in his trade or business an individual who immediately prior to the acquisition was employed in the trade or business of such predecessor, then, for the purpose of determining whether remuneration, other than remuneration referred to in the succeeding subdivisions of this subsection, with respect to employment equal to $8,000 is payable by the successor to such individual during such calendar year, any remuneration, other than remuneration referred to in the succeeding subdivisions of this subsection, with respect to employment payable, or considered under this subdivision as payable, to such individual by such predecessor during such calendar year and prior to such acquisition shall be considered as payable by such successor employer;

The amount of any payment, including any amount paid by an employer for insurance or annuities, or into a fund, to provide for any such payment, made to, or on behalf of, an employee or any of his dependents under a plan or system established by an employer which makes provisions for (i) his employees generally, (ii) for his employees generally and their dependents, (iii) for a class or classes of his employees, or (iv) for a class or classes of his employees and their dependents, on account of:

Retirement;

Sickness or accident disability payments which are received under a workers’ compensation law;

Medical or hospitalization expenses in connection with sickness or accident disability;

Death; or

Unemployment benefits under any private plan financed in whole or in part by an employer;

3.

The payment by an employer, without deduction from the remuneration of the employee, of the tax imposed upon an employer under § 3101 of the Federal Internal Revenue Code;

4.

Any payment on account of sickness or accident disability, or medical or hospitalization expenses in connection with the sickness or accident disability, made by an employer to, or on behalf of, an employee after the expiration of six calendar months following the last calendar month in which the employee worked for such employer;

5.

Remuneration paid in any medium other than cash to an employee for service not in the course of the employer’s trade or business;

6.

Any payment, other than vacation or sick pay, made to an employee after the month in which he attains the age of sixty-five, if he did not work for the employer in the period for which such payment is made; or

7.

Any payment made to, or on behalf of, an employee or his beneficiary under a cafeteria plan, as defined in § 125 of the Internal Revenue Code, if such payment would not be treated as wages under the Internal Revenue Code.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-22; 1952, c. 184; 1954, c. 203; 1956, c. 440; 1968, c. 9; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-26; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 235; 1974, c. 466; 1976, c. 591; 1977, c. 330; 1979, cc. 629, 637; 1982, c. 363; 1983, c. 14; 1984, cc. 204, 408; 1986, c. 480; 1990, c. 908; 1993, c. 576; 1995, c. 515; 2020, c. 1261.

Cross references.

As to transitional severance benefits, see §

2.2-3203

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1261, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of § 30-19.03:1.2 of the Code of Virginia shall not apply to this act.”

Acts 2020, c. 1261, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on January 1, 2021, if the Virginia Employment Commission has not, on or before such date, received adequate funding from the U.S. Department of Labor that covers the costs of information technology upgrades, training, publicity, and marketing that are incurred by the Virginia Employment Commission in connection with establishing the short-time compensation program pursuant to the first enactment of this act.” Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 8, cl. 2, effective October 21, 2020,
repealed clauses 3 and 4 of Acts 2020, c. 1261. The amendments by Acts 2020, c. 1261 will not expire.

Acts 2020, c. 1261, cl. 4 provides: “That, if not sooner expired pursuant to the provisions of the third enactment of this act, this act shall expire on July 1, 2022.” Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 8, cl. 2, effective October 21, 2020, repealed clauses 3 and 4 of Acts 2020, c. 1261. The amendments by Acts 2020, c. 1261 will not expire.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1261 added subdivision B 7 and made related changes.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law of governmental services and social welfare for the year 1976-1977, see 63 Va. L. Rev. 1440 (1977).

§ 60.2-230.
Week.

“Week”
means calendar week, ending at midnight Saturday, or the equivalent thereof as determined in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Commission, except as provided for in subdivision 9 of subsection B of §

60.2-210

.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-23; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-27; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 235; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-231.
Certain federal acts and statutes defined.

The following federal acts and laws as used in this title shall mean the following:

The Federal Unemployment Tax Act shall mean those provisions found in Chapter 23 (26 U.S.C. § 3301 et seq.) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

The Federal Internal Revenue Code shall mean those provisions found in Title 26 of the United States Code.

The Social Security Act shall mean those provisions found in Chapter 7 (42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-19; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-22; 1986, c. 480.